Utah statutes.
63G-6-418 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Right of state to inspect place of business of contractor or subcontractor.

The state may, at reasonable times, inspect the part of the plant or place of business of a contractor or any subcontractor which is related to the performance of any contract awarded or to be awarded by the state.



Repealed by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

